New Jersey, session 221, S2853.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1947, c.94 (C.33:1-12.14) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in this [act] Title and subsection b. of this section, a new plenary retail consumption or seasonal retail consumption license shall not be issued in a municipality unless and until the combined total number of such licenses existing in the municipality is fewer than one for each 3,000 of its population [according to the most recent estimates issued by the U.S. Bureau of the Census; provided, however, in the year that the official federal decennial counts are received by the Governor, those federal decennial counts shall be used] . b.    The governing body of a municipality may adopt an ordinance to decrease over the course of five years the population limit necessary to issue plenary retail consumption licenses or seasonal retail consumption licenses established pursuant to subsection a. of this section. A municipal ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection shall establish that a new plenary retail consumption or seasonal retail consumption license shall not be issued in the municipality unless and until: (1)   prior to the first day of the 13th month following the adoption of the ordinance, the combined total number of such licenses existing in the municipality is fewer than one for each 3,000 of its population; (2)   on the first day of the 13th month following the adoption of the ordinance, the combined total number of such licenses existing in the municipality is fewer than one for each 2,800 of its population; (3)   on the first day of the 25th month following the adoption of the ordinance, the combined total number of such licenses existing in the municipality is fewer than one for each 2,600 of its population; (4)   on the first day of the 37th month following the adoption of the ordinance, the combined total number of such licenses existing in the municipality is fewer than one for each 2,400 of its population; (5)   on the first day of the 49th month following the adoption of the ordinance, the combined total number of such licenses existing in the municipality is fewer than one for each 2,200 of its population; and (6)   on the first day of the 61st month following the adoption of the ordinance, the combined total number of such licenses existing in the municipality is fewer than one for each 2,000 of its population. [No]  c.  A  new plenary retail distribution license shall not be issued in a municipality unless and until the number of such licenses existing in the municipality is fewer than one for each 7,500 of its population [according to the most recent estimates issued by the U.S. Bureau of the Census; provided, however, in the year that the official federal decennial counts are received by the Governor, those federal decennial counts shall be used]. d.    A municipalitys population shall be determined pursuant to this section according to the most recent estimates issued by the U.S. Bureau of the Census; provided, however, in the year that the official federal decennial counts are received by the Governor, those federal decennial counts shall be used. (cf: P.L.1999, c.189, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.